New Jersey, session 222, A3900.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.38:23-1 is amended to read as follows: 38:23-1.     a.   A permanent or full-time temporary officer or employee of the State or of a board, commission, authority or other instrumentality of the State, or of a county, school district or municipality, who is a member of the organized reserve of the Army of the United States, United States Naval Reserve, United States Air Force Reserve or United States Marine Corps Reserve, or other organization affiliated therewith, including the National Guard of other states, shall be entitled, in addition to pay received, if any, as a member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, to leave of absence from his or her respective duty without loss of pay or time on all work days on which he or she shall be engaged in any period of Federal active duty[,] or any period of required inactive duty training or other regularly scheduled required training; provided, however, that such leaves of absence shall not exceed 30 work days in any calendar year.  Such leave of absence shall be in addition to the regular vacation or other accrued leave allowed such officer or employee. Any leave of absence for such duty in excess of 30 work days shall be without pay but without loss of time. b.    Notwithstanding subsection a. of this section, a full-time temporary officer or employee who has served under such temporary appointment for less than one year shall receive for the service hereinabove described leave without pay but without loss of time. (cf: P.L.2001, c.351, s.1) 2.    N.J.S.38A:4-4 is amended to read as follows: 38A:4-4.     a.   A permanent or full-time temporary officer or employee of the State or of a board, commission, authority or other instrumentality of the State or of a county, school district or municipality who is a member of the organized militia shall be entitled, in addition to pay received, if any, as a member of the organized militia, to leave of absence from his or her respective duties without loss of pay or time on all days during which he or she shall be engaged in any period of State or Federal active duty or any period of required inactive duty training or other regularly scheduled required training; provided, however, that the leaves of absence for Federal active duty or active duty for training shall not exceed 90 work days in the aggregate in any calendar year  Any leave of absence for such duty in excess of 90 work days shall be without pay but without loss of time. b.    Leave of absence for such military duty shall be in addition to the regular vacation or other accrued leave allowed such officers and employees by the State, county or municipal law, ordinance, resolution, or regulation. c.     Notwithstanding subsection a. of this section, a full-time temporary officer or employee who has served under such temporary appointment for less than one year shall receive for the service hereinabove described leave without pay but without loss of time. (cf: P.L.2001, c.351, s.3) 3.    Section 4 of P.L.2001, c.351 (C.52:13H-2.1) is amended to read as follows: 4.    In accordance with the provisions of Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 5 of the New Jersey Constitution, upon application for reimbursement by a county or municipal governing body or a board of education to the State Treasurer for reimbursement and approval of the application by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, reimbursement shall be made by the State for any costs incurred as a result of the provisions of P.L.2001, c.351 or P.L.   , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2001, c.351, s.4) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.